District of Columbia statutes.
32-217

Street-trades badges — Application requirements.

The Board of Education shall issue a street-trades badge only upon the application of the minor desiring it, with the written consent of the parent, guardian, or custodian of such minor, and upon proof that the minor is of the age required by § 32-215, which shall consist of the same evidence as is required for a work permit under this subchapter. A work permit issued as required by this subchapter may be accepted in lieu of any other requirements for said badge.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1004, ch. 908, § 20
renumbered as § 17 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(21), 23 DCR 524
1981 Ed., § 36-517.
1973 Ed., § 36-220.